Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Article 5. Geologic Sequestration Activities

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 30, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.

§ 30-5-501.
Oil and gas activities at geologic sequestration sites.

Nothing in W.S.

35-11-313

shall be deemed to affect the otherwise lawful right of a surface or mineral owner to drill or bore through a geologic sequestration site as defined by W.S. 35-11-103(c)(xxi), if done in accordance with the commission rules for protecting the geologic sequestration site against the escape of carbon dioxide.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 30, § 1.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2008, Ch. 30, § 3 provides: “There is appropriated two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00) from the general fund to the department of environmental quality for use by the working group created by W.S. 35-11-313(g) for expenses related to performing the tasks assigned it pursuant to this act. Expenses may include the costs to secure expert consultation. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2010. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010. This appropriation shall not be included in the department's standard biennial budget request.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2008, Ch. 30, §§ 4, 5 provide as follows: “Nothing in this act is intended to impede or impair the ability of an oil and gas operator to inject carbon dioxide through an approved enhanced oil or gas recovery project and establish, verify, register and sell emission reduction credits associated with the project.”

§ 5: “The department of environmental quality and the oil and gas conservation commission shall submit a joint written report, on or before November 1 of each year, to the joint minerals, business and economic development and joint judiciary interim committees as to all aspects of compliance with this legislation including, but not limited to, the promulgation of rules and regulations, the formation of the working group, permitting and changes to pertinent federal regulations affecting the same.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.

§ 30-5-502.
Certification of carbon dioxide incidentally stored during enhanced recovery operations. [Effective until July 1, 2023]

If there is production of oil, gas or both from enhanced recovery operations under a commission order entered pursuant to W.S.

30-5-110

utilizing the injection of carbon dioxide, the commission upon voluntary application by the unit operator, and after review of the operator’s plan for accounting for the incidentally stored carbon dioxide, may enter an order recognizing the incidental storage of carbon dioxide occurring through the enhanced recovery operation and certifying the quantity of carbon dioxide being stored. An application or certification under this section does not subject the enhanced recovery operation to the requirements of W.S.

35-11-313

through

35-11-318

or require the operator to obtain a permit under those sections.

Prior to the commission entering an order pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the commission shall, in consultation with the department of environmental quality, promulgate rules establishing standards and procedures for the certification of incidental storage of carbon dioxide and the certification of quantities of carbon dioxide incidentally stored.

History.

2015 ch. 95, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, substituted “35-11-320“ for “35-11-317” in the second sentence of (a).

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 95, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2015.

§ 30-5-502.
Certification of carbon dioxide incidentally stored during enhanced recovery operations. [Effective July 1, 2023]

If there is production of oil, gas or both from enhanced recovery operations under a commission order entered pursuant to W.S.

30-5-110

utilizing the injection of carbon dioxide, the commission upon voluntary application by the unit operator, and after review of the operator’s plan for accounting for the incidentally stored carbon dioxide, may enter an order recognizing the incidental storage of carbon dioxide occurring through the enhanced recovery operation and certifying the quantity of carbon dioxide being stored. An application or certification under this section does not subject the enhanced recovery operation to the requirements of W.S.

35-11-313

through

35-11-320

or require the operator to obtain a permit under those sections.

Prior to the commission entering an order pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the commission shall, in consultation with the department of environmental quality, promulgate rules establishing standards and procedures for the certification of incidental storage of carbon dioxide and the certification of quantities of carbon dioxide incidentally stored.

History.

2015 ch. 95, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2022 ch. 101, § 2, effective July 1, 2023.